Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,102
Information of the court.

The court may inform itself of such laws in such manner as it may deem proper, and the court may call upon counsel to aid it in obtaining such information.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 2, p. 273.

Court may require party invoking law of sister state to plead and present it. Scott v. Scott, 153 Neb. 906, 46 N.W.2d 627 (1951).